sl-SI: Oblika ogledala: Obokano; Srce; Ovalno; Pravokotno; Okroglo; Kvadratno; Trojno zložljivo; Drugo
pt-PT: Forma de espelho: Arqueado; Coração; Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Com três abas; Outro
zh-CN: 后视镜形状: 拱形; 心形; 椭圆形; 长方形; 圆形; 正方形; 三折叠; 其他
el: Σχήμα καθρέφτη: Τοξωτό; Καρδιά; Οβάλ; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Τρίπτυχο; Άλλο
pl: Kształt lustra: Łukowate; W kształcie serca; Owalne; Prostokątne; Okrągłe; Kwadratowe; Trójskrzydłowe; Inne
th: รูปทรงกระจก: ทรงโค้ง; ทรงหัวใจ; ทรงวงรี; ทรงสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; ทรงสี่เหลี่ยมจัตุรัส; พับสามตอน; อื่นๆ
sv: Spegelform: Bågformad; Hjärtformad; Oval; Rektangulär; Rund; Kvadratisk; Tredelad; Annan
nl: Spiegel vorm: Boogvormig; Hart; Ovaal; Rechthoekig; Rond; Vierkant; Drieluik; Overig
hu: Tükör alakja: Íves; Szív alakú; Ovális; Négyszögletes; Kerek; Szögletes; Háromrészes; Egyéb
vi: Hình dạng gương: Hình vòm; Hình trái tim; Hình bầu dục; Hình chữ nhật; Hình tròn; Hình vuông; Gấp ba cánh; Khác
ro-RO: Forma oglinzii: Arcuită; Inimă; Ovală; Dreptunghiulară; Rotundă; Pătrată; Triptică; Altele
fi: Peilin muoto: Kaareva; Sydän; Soikea; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Neliö; Kolmiosainen taitettava; Muu
ja: ミラーのShapes: アーチ型; ハート型; オーバル型; 長方形; ラウンド型; スクエア型; 三面鏡; その他
en: Mirror shape: Arched; Heart; Oval; Rectangular; Round; Square; Tri-fold; Other
da: Spejlform: Bueformet; Hjerteformet; Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Kvadratisk; Tredelt; Andet
lt-LT: Veidrodžio forma: Arkinis; Širdelės formos; Ovalus; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Kvadratinis; Trijų dalių sulankstomas; Kita
tr: Ayna şekli: Kemerli; Kalp; Oval; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Kare; Üç katlı; Diğer
de: Spiegelform: Bogenförmig; Herzförmig; Oval; Rechteckig; Rund; Quadratisch; Dreifach klappbar; Sonstige
nb: Speilform: Buet; Hjerte; Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Firkantet; Tredelt; Annet
hr-HR: Oblici Shapes: U obliku luka; Srce; Ovalno; Pravokutno; Okruglo; Kvadratno; Trostruko sklopivo; Ostalo
cs: Tvar zrcadla: Obloukové; Srdce; Oválné; Obdélníkové; Kulaté; Čtvercové; Třídílné; Jiné
it: Forma dello specchio: Ad arco; A cuore; Ovale; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Quadrato; A tre ante; Altro
sk-SK: Tvar zrkadla: Oblúkové; Srdce; Oválne; Obdĺžnikové; Okrúhle; Štvorcové; Trojdielne; Iné
bg-BG: Форма на огледалото: Сводесто; Сърце; Овално; Правоъгълно; Кръгло; Квадратно; Тройно сгъваемо; Друго
fr: Forme du miroir: Arqué; Cœur; Ovale; Rectangulaire; Rond; Carré; Triptyque; Autre
ko: 거울 모양: 아치형; 하트형; 타원형; 직사각형; 원형; 정사각형; 3단 접이식; 기타
ru: Форма зеркала: Арочное; Сердце; Овальное; Прямоугольное; Круглое; Квадратное; Трехстворчатое; Другое
zh-TW: 鏡子形狀: 拱形; 心形; 橢圓形; 長方形; 圓形; 正方形; 三折; 其他
es: Forma del espejo: Arqueado; Corazón; Ovalado; Rectangular; Redondo; Cuadrado; Tríptico; Otro
pt-BR: Espelho formato: Arqueado; Coração; Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Quadrado; Em três partes; Outro